Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-163] Restrictions on borrower.
Every loan made under this subpart shall be subject to the following
conditions:

(1) The borrower shall expend no portion of the
borrower's downpayment loan for purposes other than to make a downpayment for
the purchase of a residential property;

(2) The residential property purchased with the
downpayment loan and mortgaged to the State to secure the repayment of the loan
shall not be sold or assigned without the prior approval in writing of the
corporation and the first mortgage lender;

(3) The borrower shall pay when due all taxes, liens,
judgments, or assessments that may be lawfully levied against the residential
property and all costs and expenses of any foreclosure of the mortgage made to
the State;

(4) The borrower shall maintain fire and casualty
insurance in amounts equal to the replacement value of all improvements and
insurable portions of the residential property with an insurance company
authorized to do business in the State. All proceeds of that insurance shall
be made payable to the first mortgage lender and the corporation as their
respective interests may appear at the time of any loss or damage. Subject to
the rules of the corporation, in the event of any loss or damage to the
improvements or property covered by the insurance, the proceeds receivable by
the State shall be applied toward the reconstruction of the improvements or
property destroyed or damaged, unless otherwise determined by the corporation
on behalf of the State; and

(5) The borrower shall maintain the improvements in
good repair.

All of the conditions in paragraphs (1) through
(5) shall be a part of any downpayment mortgage executed under this subpart,
regardless of whether or not they are expressly incorporated in the mortgage document.
[L 2006, c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next